Utah statutes.
54-8-16.   Notice of assessment -- Publication.
(1)  After the preparation of a resolution under Section 54-8-14, notice of a
public hearing on the proposed assessments shall be given.
(2)  The notice described in Subsection (1) shall be:
(a)  published:
(i)  one time in a newspaper in which the first notice of hearing was
published at least 20 days before the date fixed for the hearing; and
(ii) on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701, for at
least 20 days before the date fixed for the hearing; and
(b)  mailed by certified mail not less than 15 days prior to the date fixed
for such hearing to each owner of real property whose property will be
assessed for part of the cost of the improvement at the last known address of
such owner using for such purpose the names and addresses appearing on the
last completed real property assessment rolls of the county wherein said
affected property is located.
(3)  In addition, a copy of such notice shall be addressed to "Owner" and
shall be so mailed addressed to the street number of each piece of improved
property to be affected by such assessment.
(4)  Each notice shall state that at the specified time and place, the
governing body will hold a public hearing upon the proposed assessments and
shall state that any owner of any property to be assessed pursuant to the
resolution will be heard on the question of whether his property will be
benefited by the proposed improvement to the amount of the proposed assessment
against his property and whether the amount assessed against his property
constitutes more than his proper proportional share of the total cost of the
improvement.
(5)  The notice shall further state where a copy of the resolution proposed to
be adopted levying the assessments against all real property in the district
will be on file for public inspection, and that subject to such changes and
corrections therein as may be made by the governing body, it is proposed to
adopt the resolution at the conclusion of the hearing.
(6)  A published notice shall describe the boundaries or area of the district
with sufficient particularity to permit each owner of real property therein to
ascertain that his property lies in the district.
(7)  The mailed notice may refer to the district by name and date of creation
and shall state the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied against the
real property of the person to whom the notice is mailed.
